Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4338
State of Nebraska; agreement with bond holders.

The State of Nebraska does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds and with those parties who may enter into contracts with any risk management pool or member of a risk management pool under the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act that the state will not alter, impair, or limit the rights thereby vested until the bonds, together with applicable interest, are fully met and discharged and such contracts are fully performed. Nothing contained in the act shall preclude such alteration, impairment, or limitation if and when adequate provisions have been made by law for the protection of the holders of the bonds or persons entering into contracts with any risk management pool or member of a risk management pool. Each risk management pool and member of a risk management pool may include this pledge and undertaking for the state in such bonds or contracts.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 38.